Maryland, session 2026, SB0664.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
9.5–113.
(a) In this section, “Program” means the Child Care Scholarship Program.
(b) The Department shall administer the Program in accordance with federal law.
(c) (1) The Department shall:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0664*

SENATE BILL 664
(i) Establish a process that meets the requirements of this
subsection for granting presumptive eligibility for a [subsidy] SCHOLARSHIP under the
Program; [and]
(ii) Incorporate the framework of the Youth Transitioning From
Foster Placement to Successful Adulthood Program as established under § 9.5–113.2 of this
subtitle; AND
(III) FOR APPLICATIONS THE DEPARTMENT RECEIVES AFTER
JULY 1, 2026, ESTABLISH A FRAMEWORK TO PRIORITIZE THE CHILDREN OF
INDIVIDUALS WHO PROVIDE CARE FOR CHILDREN IN LICENSED CHILD CARE
CENTERS, REGISTERED FAMILY CHILD CARE HOMES, AND REGISTERED LARGE
FAMILY CHILD CARE HOMES FOR SCHOLARSHIPS UNDER THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.